src/srseng/resources/fst/eng2srs.lexc
LEXICON Root
< [ c a r r y %  t a k e %  g r a n u l a r "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg1" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ I [ 0 | %  w i l l ] %  [ c a r r y | t a k e ] %  i t [ 0 | %  g r a n u l a r ] ] > # ;
< [ c a r r y %  t a k e %  g r a n u l a r "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg2" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ y o u [ 0 | %  w i l l ] %  [ c a r r y | t a k e ] %  i t [ 0 | %  g r a n u l a r ] ] > # ;
< [ c a r r y %  t a k e %  g r a n u l a r "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg3" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ [ h e | s h e ] [ 0 | %  w i l l ] %  [ c a r r y | t a k e ] %  i t [ 0 | %  g r a n u l a r ] ] > # ;
< [ c a r r y %  t a k e %  g r a n u l a r "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl1" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ w e [ 0 | %  w i l l ] %  [ c a r r y | t a k e ] %  i t [ 0 | %  g r a n u l a r ] ] > # ;
< [ c a r r y %  t a k e %  g r a n u l a r "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl2" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ y o u %  a l l [ 0 | %  w i l l ] %  [ c a r r y | t a k e ] %  i t [ 0 | %  g r a n u l a r ] ] > # ;
< [ c a r r y %  t a k e %  g r a n u l a r "+V" "+I" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl3" ] : [ t h e y [ 0 | %  w i l l ] %  [ c a r r y | t a k e ] [ 0 | %  g r a n u l a r ] ] > # ;
< [ c a r r y %  t a k e %  g r a n u l a r "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg4" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ s o m e o n e [ 0 | %  w i l l ] %  [ c a r r y | t a k e ] %  i t [ 0 | %  g r a n u l a r ] ] > # ;
< [ c a r r y %  t a k e %  g r a n u l a r "+V" "+T" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg1" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ I %  [ c a r r i e d | t o o k ] %  i t [ 0 | %  g r a n u l a r ] ] > # ;
< [ c a r r y %  t a k e %  g r a n u l a r "+V" "+T" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg2" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ y o u %  [ c a r r i e d | t o o k ] %  i t [ 0 | %  g r a n u l a r ] ] > # ;
< [ c a r r y %  t a k e %  g r a n u l a r "+V" "+T" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg3" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ [ h e | s h e ] %  [ c a r r i e d | t o o k ] %  i t [ 0 | %  g r a n u l a r ] ] > # ;
< [ c a r r y %  t a k e %  g r a n u l a r "+V" "+T" "+Pfv" "+SbjPl1" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ w e %  [ c a r r i e d | t o o k ] %  i t [ 0 | %  g r a n u l a r ] ] > # ;
< [ c a r r y %  t a k e %  g r a n u l a r "+V" "+T" "+Pfv" "+SbjPl2" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ y o u %  a l l %  [ c a r r i e d | t o o k ] %  i t [ 0 | %  g r a n u l a r ] ] > # ;
< [ c a r r y %  t a k e %  g r a n u l a r "+V" "+T" "+Pfv" "+SbjPl3" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ t h e y %  [ c a r r i e d | t o o k ] %  i t [ 0 | %  g r a n u l a r ] ] > # ;
< [ c a r r y %  t a k e %  g r a n u l a r "+V" "+T" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg4" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ s o m e o n e %  [ c a r r i e d | t o o k ] %  i t [ 0 | %  g r a n u l a r ] ] > # ;
< [ c a r r y %  t a k e %  s o m e t h i n g %  h o m e %  g r a n u l a r "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg1" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ I [ 0 | %  w i l l ] %  [ c a r r y | t a k e ] %  s o m e t h i n g %  h o m e [ 0 | %  g r a n u l a r ] ] > # ;
< [ c a r r y %  t a k e %  s o m e t h i n g %  h o m e %  g r a n u l a r "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg2" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ y o u [ 0 | %  w i l l ] %  [ c a r r y | t a k e ] %  s o m e t h i n g %  h o m e [ 0 | %  g r a n u l a r ] ] > # ;
< [ c a r r y %  t a k e %  s o m e t h i n g %  h o m e %  g r a n u l a r "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg3" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ [ h e | s h e ] [ 0 | %  w i l l ] %  [ c a r r y | t a k e ] %  s o m e t h i n g %  h o m e [ 0 | %  g r a n u l a r ] ] > # ;
< [ c a r r y %  t a k e %  s o m e t h i n g %  h o m e %  g r a n u l a r "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl1" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ w e [ 0 | %  w i l l ] %  [ c a r r y | t a k e ] %  s o m e t h i n g %  h o m e [ 0 | %  g r a n u l a r ] ] > # ;
< [ c a r r y %  t a k e %  s o m e t h i n g %  h o m e %  g r a n u l a r "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl2" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ y o u %  a l l [ 0 | %  w i l l ] %  [ c a r r y | t a k e ] %  s o m e t h i n g %  h o m e [ 0 | %  g r a n u l a r ] ] > # ;
< [ c a r r y %  t a k e %  s o m e t h i n g %  h o m e %  g r a n u l a r "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl3" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ t h e y [ 0 | %  w i l l ] %  [ c a r r y | t a k e ] %  s o m e t h i n g %  h o m e [ 0 | %  g r a n u l a r ] ] > # ;
< [ c a r r y %  t a k e %  s o m e t h i n g %  h o m e %  g r a n u l a r "+V" "+T" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg4" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ s o m e o n e [ 0 | %  w i l l ] %  [ c a r r y | t a k e ] %  s o m e t h i n g %  h o m e [ 0 | %  g r a n u l a r ] ] > # ;
< [ h a n d %  g i v e %  s o m e t h i n g %  t o %  g r a n u l a r "+V" "+D" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg1" "+DObjSg3" "+IObjSg3" ] : [ I [ 0 | %  w i l l ] %  [ h a n d | g i v e ] %  s o m e t h i n g %  t o %  [ h i m | h e r ] [ 0 | %  g r a n u l a r ] ] > # ;
< [ h a n d %  g i v e %  s o m e t h i n g %  t o %  g r a n u l a r "+V" "+D" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg2" "+DObjSg3" "+IObjSg3" ] : [ y o u [ 0 | %  w i l l ] %  [ h a n d | g i v e ] %  s o m e t h i n g %  t o %  [ h i m | h e r ] [ 0 | %  g r a n u l a r ] ] > # ;
< [ h a n d %  g i v e %  s o m e t h i n g %  t o %  g r a n u l a r "+V" "+D" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg3" "+DObjSg3" "+IObjSg3" ] : [ [ h e | s h e ] [ 0 | %  w i l l ] %  [ h a n d | g i v e ] %  s o m e t h i n g %  t o %  [ h i m | h e r ] [ 0 | %  g r a n u l a r ] ] > # ;
< [ h a n d %  g i v e %  s o m e t h i n g %  t o %  g r a n u l a r "+V" "+D" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl1" "+DObjSg3" "+IObjSg3" ] : [ w e [ 0 | %  w i l l ] %  [ h a n d | g i v e ] %  s o m e t h i n g %  t o %  [ h i m | h e r ] [ 0 | %  g r a n u l a r ] ] > # ;
< [ h a n d %  g i v e %  s o m e t h i n g %  t o %  g r a n u l a r "+V" "+D" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl2" "+DObjSg3" "+IObjSg3" ] : [ y o u %  a l l [ 0 | %  w i l l ] %  [ h a n d | g i v e ] %  s o m e t h i n g %  t o %  [ h i m | h e r ] [ 0 | %  g r a n u l a r ] ] > # ;
< [ h a n d %  g i v e %  s o m e t h i n g %  t o %  g r a n u l a r "+V" "+D" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl3" "+DObjSg3" "+IObjSg3" ] : [ t h e y [ 0 | %  w i l l ] %  [ h a n d | g i v e ] %  s o m e t h i n g %  t o %  [ h i m | h e r ] [ 0 | %  g r a n u l a r ] ] > # ;
< [ h a n d %  g i v e %  s o m e t h i n g %  t o %  g r a n u l a r "+V" "+D" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg4" "+DObjSg3" "+IObjSg3" ] : [ s o m e o n e [ 0 | %  w i l l ] %  [ h a n d | g i v e ] %  s o m e t h i n g %  t o %  [ h i m | h e r ] [ 0 | %  g r a n u l a r ] ] > # ;
< [ h a n d %  g i v e %  t o %  g r a n u l a r "+V" "+D" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg1" "+DObjSg3" "+IObjSg3" ] : [ I [ 0 | %  w i l l ] %  [ h a n d | g i v e ] %  i t %  t o %  [ h i m | h e r ] [ 0 | %  g r a n u l a r ] ] > # ;
< [ h a n d %  g i v e %  t o %  g r a n u l a r "+V" "+D" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg2" "+DObjSg3" "+IObjSg3" ] : [ y o u [ 0 | %  w i l l ] %  [ h a n d | g i v e ] %  i t %  t o %  [ h i m | h e r ] [ 0 | %  g r a n u l a r ] ] > # ;
< [ h a n d %  g i v e %  t o %  g r a n u l a r "+V" "+D" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg3" "+DObjSg3" "+IObjSg3" ] : [ [ h e | s h e ] [ 0 | %  w i l l ] %  [ h a n d | g i v e ] %  i t %  t o %  [ h i m | h e r ] [ 0 | %  g r a n u l a r ] ] > # ;
< [ h a n d %  g i v e %  t o %  g r a n u l a r "+V" "+D" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl1" "+DObjSg3" "+IObjSg3" ] : [ w e [ 0 | %  w i l l ] %  [ h a n d | g i v e ] %  i t %  t o %  [ h i m | h e r ] [ 0 | %  g r a n u l a r ] ] > # ;
< [ h a n d %  g i v e %  t o %  g r a n u l a r "+V" "+D" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl2" "+DObjSg3" "+IObjSg3" ] : [ y o u %  a l l [ 0 | %  w i l l ] %  [ h a n d | g i v e ] %  i t %  t o %  [ h i m | h e r ] [ 0 | %  g r a n u l a r ] ] > # ;
< [ h a n d %  g i v e %  t o %  g r a n u l a r "+V" "+D" "+Ipfv" "+SbjPl3" "+DObjSg3" "+IObjSg3" ] : [ t h e y [ 0 | %  w i l l ] %  [ h a n d | g i v e ] %  i t %  t o %  [ h i m | h e r ] [ 0 | %  g r a n u l a r ] ] > # ;
< [ h a n d %  g i v e %  t o %  g r a n u l a r "+V" "+D" "+Ipfv" "+SbjSg4" "+DObjSg3" "+IObjSg3" ] : [ s o m e o n e [ 0 | %  w i l l ] %  [ h a n d | g i v e ] %  i t %  t o %  [ h i m | h e r ] [ 0 | %  g r a n u l a r ] ] > # ;
< [ h a n d %  g i v e %  s o m e t h i n g %  t o %  g r a n u l a r "+V" "+D" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg1" "+DObjSg3" "+IObjSg3" ] : [ I %  [ h a n d e d | g a v e ] %  s o m e t h i n g %  t o %  [ h i m | h e r ] [ 0 | %  g r a n u l a r ] ] > # ;
< [ h a n d %  g i v e %  s o m e t h i n g %  t o %  g r a n u l a r "+V" "+D" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg2" "+DObjSg3" "+IObjSg3" ] : [ y o u %  [ h a n d e d | g a v e ] %  s o m e t h i n g %  t o %  [ h i m | h e r ] [ 0 | %  g r a n u l a r ] ] > # ;
< [ h a n d %  g i v e %  s o m e t h i n g %  t o %  g r a n u l a r "+V" "+D" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg3" "+DObjSg3" "+IObjSg3" ] : [ h e %  [ h a n d e d | g a v e ] %  s o m e t h i n g %  t o %  [ h i m | h e r ] [ 0 | %  g r a n u l a r ] ] > # ;
< [ h a n d %  g i v e %  s o m e t h i n g %  t o %  g r a n u l a r "+V" "+D" "+Pfv" "+SbjPl1" "+DObjSg3" "+IObjSg3" ] : [ w e %  [ h a n d e d | g a v e ] %  s o m e t h i n g %  t o %  [ h i m | h e r ] [ 0 | %  g r a n u l a r ] ] > # ;
< [ h a n d %  g i v e %  s o m e t h i n g %  t o %  g r a n u l a r "+V" "+D" "+Pfv" "+SbjPl2" "+DObjSg3" "+IObjSg3" ] : [ y o u %  a l l %  [ h a n d e d | g a v e ] %  s o m e t h i n g %  t o %  [ h i m | h e r ] [ 0 | %  g r a n u l a r ] ] > # ;
< [ h a n d %  g i v e %  s o m e t h i n g %  t o %  g r a n u l a r "+V" "+D" "+Pfv" "+SbjPl3" "+DObjSg3" "+IObjSg3" ] : [ t h e y %  [ h a n d e d | g a v e ] %  s o m e t h i n g %  t o %  [ h i m | h e r ] [ 0 | %  g r a n u l a r ] ] > # ;
< [ h a n d %  g i v e %  s o m e t h i n g %  t o %  g r a n u l a r "+V" "+D" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg4" "+DObjSg3" "+IObjSg3" ] : [ s o m e o n e %  [ h a n d e d | g a v e ] %  s o m e t h i n g %  t o %  [ h i m | h e r ] [ 0 | %  g r a n u l a r ] ] > # ;
< [ h a n d %  g i v e %  t o %  g r a n u l a r "+V" "+D" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg1" "+DObjSg3" "+IObjSg3" ] : [ I %  [ h a n d e d | g a v e ] %  i t %  t o %  [ h i m | h e r ] [ 0 | %  g r a n u l a r ] ] > # ;
< [ h a n d %  g i v e %  t o %  g r a n u l a r "+V" "+D" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg2" "+DObjSg3" "+IObjSg3" ] : [ y o u %  [ h a n d e d | g a v e ] %  i t %  t o %  [ h i m | h e r ] [ 0 | %  g r a n u l a r ] ] > # ;
< [ h a n d %  g i v e %  t o %  g r a n u l a r "+V" "+D" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg3" "+DObjSg3" "+IObjSg3" ] : [ [ h e | s h e ] %  [ h a n d e d | g a v e ] %  i t %  t o %  [ h i m | h e r ] [ 0 | %  g r a n u l a r ] ] > # ;
< [ h a n d %  g i v e %  t o %  g r a n u l a r "+V" "+D" "+Pfv" "+SbjPl1" "+DObjSg3" "+IObjSg3" ] : [ w e %  [ h a n d e d | g a v e ] %  i t %  t o %  [ h i m | h e r ] [ 0 | %  g r a n u l a r ] ] > # ;
< [ h a n d %  g i v e %  t o %  g r a n u l a r "+V" "+D" "+Pfv" "+SbjPl2" "+DObjSg3" "+IObjSg3" ] : [ y o u %  a l l %  [ h a n d e d | g a v e ] %  i t %  t o %  [ h i m | h e r ] [ 0 | %  g r a n u l a r ] ] > # ;
< [ h a n d %  g i v e %  t o %  g r a n u l a r "+V" "+D" "+Pfv" "+SbjPl3" "+DObjSg3" "+IObjSg3" ] : [ t h e y %  [ h a n d e d | g a v e ] %  i t %  t o %  [ h i m | h e r ] [ 0 | %  g r a n u l a r ] ] > # ;
< [ h a n d %  g i v e %  t o %  g r a n u l a r "+V" "+D" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg4" "+DObjSg3" "+IObjSg3" ] : [ s o m e o n e %  [ h a n d e d | g a v e ] %  i t %  t o %  [ h i m | h e r ] [ 0 | %  g r a n u l a r ] ] > # ;
< [ s t a r t %  c a r r y i n g %  t a k i n g %  i n s i d e %  g r a n u l a r "+V" "+T" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg1" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ I %  s t a r t e d %  [ c a r r y i n g | t a k i n g ] %  i t %  i n s i d e [ 0 | %  g r a n u l a r ] ] > # ;
< [ s t a r t %  c a r r y i n g %  t a k i n g %  i n s i d e %  g r a n u l a r "+V" "+T" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg2" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ y o u %  s t a r t e d %  [ c a r r y i n g | t a k i n g ] %  i t %  i n s i d e [ 0 | %  g r a n u l a r ] ] > # ;
< [ s t a r t %  c a r r y i n g %  t a k i n g %  i n s i d e %  g r a n u l a r "+V" "+T" "+Pfv" "+SbjSg3" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ [ h e | s h e ] %  s t a r t e d %  [ c a r r y i n g | t a k i n g ] %  i t %  i n s i d e [ 0 | %  g r a n u l a r ] ] > # ;
< [ s t a r t %  c a r r y i n g %  t a k i n g %  i n s i d e %  g r a n u l a r "+V" "+T" "+Pfv" "+SbjPl1" "+DObjSg3" ] : [ w e %  s t a r t e d %  [ c a r r y i n g | t a k i n g ] %  i t %  i n s i d e [ 0 | %  g r a n u l a r ] ] > # ;
